Rhode Island, session 2025, SB568.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 31-51-2, 31-51-3, and 31-51-5.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-
51 entitled "School Bus Safety Enforcement" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-51-2. Live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems.
(a) All school departments of this state are hereby authorized to install and operate live
digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems. Such systems shall at a minimum,
be systems which monitor and detect school bus traffic violations. For purposes of this chapter a
live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system means a system with one or
more camera sensors and computers which produce live digital and recorded video of motor
vehicles being operated in violation of school bus traffic laws in violation of 31-20-12. All systems
installed for used use under this chapter must shall, at a minimum, produce a live visual image
viewable remotely, a recorded image of the license plate, and be able to record the time, date, and
location of the vehicle, and a signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the violation via live
video.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, all new school buses to be operated pursuant to § 31-20-
11(a) shall be equipped with a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system
that conforms with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) On and after July 1, 2032, all school buses to be operated pursuant to § 31-20-11(a)
shall be equipped with a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system that

conforms with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(b)(d) The school departments with input and approval by the municipal police chief may
enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide live digital video school
bus violation detection monitoring systems and to maintain and operate such systems.
31-51-3. Procedure — Notice.
(a) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all prosecutions based on evidence
produced by a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall follow the
procedures established in chapter 41.1 of this title, chapter 18 of title 8 and the rules promulgated
by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal for the hearing of civil traffic violations in the traffic
tribunal. Provided, that in an action brought pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, references
in chapter 41.1 of this title to an “operator” shall apply to the registered owner of the vehicle. A
summons may be issued by an officer solely based on evidence obtained by use of a live digital
video school bus violation detection monitoring system. All summonses issued based on evidence
obtained from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall be issued
within ten (10) days of the violation. Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the
contrary, exclusive jurisdiction to hear and decide any violation under this chapter shall be with the
traffic tribunal. as follows:
(1) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a state
agency;
(2) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
town which has not established a municipal court; and
(3) By the municipal court over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
town which has established a municipal court.
(b) It shall be sufficient to commence a prosecution based on evidence obtained from a live
digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system. A copy of the summons and
supporting documentation shall be mailed to the address of the registered owner kept on file by the
registry of motor vehicles. For purposes of this section, the date of issuance shall be the date of
mailing.
(c) The officer issuing the citation shall certify under penalties of perjury that the evidence
obtained from the live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system was sufficient
to demonstrate a violation of the motor vehicle code. Such certification shall be sufficient in all
prosecutions pursuant to this chapter to justify the entry of a default judgment upon sufficient proof
of actual notice in all cases where the citation is not answered within the time period permitted.
(d) The summons shall contain all the information provided for on the uniform summons
LC001744/SUB A - Page 2 of 7

as referred to in § 31-41.1-1 and the rules of procedure promulgated by the chief magistrate of the
traffic tribunal as well as the date, time, and location of the violation. In addition, the following
information shall be attached to or accompany the summons:
(1) Copies of two (2) or more photographs, or microphotographs, videos, or other recorded
images taken as proof of the violation;
(2) A signed statement certified under the penalties of perjury by a trained law enforcement
officer that, based on inspection of recorded images and video, the motor vehicle was being
operated in violation of this chapter;
(3) A signed statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of this chapter;
(4) A statement that the person who receives the summons under this chapter may either
pay the civil fine in accordance with the provisions of § 31-51-2.2, proceed under § 31-51-5(c)(3)
of this section, or elect to stand trial for the alleged violation;
(5) A signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the motor vehicle being operated in
violation of this chapter; and
(6) A signed statement certified under the penalties of perjury by a trained law enforcement
officer that the summons and attachments required under this subsection were mailed to the address
of the registered owner kept on file by the registry of motor vehicles.
(e) Any summons issued pursuant to this chapter shall be issued by a law enforcement
officer authorized to issue a traffic violation summons pursuant to this title.
31-51-5.1. Revenue.
The revenue generated from each fine imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated
as follows:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) to the vendor;
(2) Twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) Forty percent (40%) to the state general fund; and
(3) Twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) to the
(2)(i) Thirty percent (30%) to the municipality where the violation takes place; and
(ii) Thirty percent (30%) to the vendor who supplies and supports the video detection
monitoring system being used; and
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts existing at the time of the
enactment of this section, and shall only apply to new contracts, or extensions of existing contracts,
entered into on or after the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2. Section 8-18-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-18 entitled "State and
Municipal Court Compact" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-18-3. Jurisdiction for certain violations. [Effective until January 15, 2027.]
LC001744/SUB A - Page 3 of 7

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, jurisdiction over the adjudication of matters
relating to violations enumerated in the following sections of the general laws is hereby conferred
upon the municipal courts and the traffic tribunal:
31-13-431-13-9 31-13-11 31-14-3 31-14-9 31-15-1 31-15-3
31-15-431-15-5 31-15-6 31-15-7 31-15-9 31-15-11 31-15-12
31-15-1331-16-1 31-16-2 31-16-4 31-16-5 31-16-7 31-16-9
31-17-131-17-2 31-17-4 31-17-6 31-17-7 31-18-12 31-20-1
31-20-231-20-9 31-21-4 31-22-2 31-22-4 31-22-5 31-22-6
31-22-731-22-8 31-22-9 31-23-1 31-23-8 31-23-13 31-23-14
31-23-1531-24-1 31-24-4 31-24-5 31-24-7 31-24-12 31-38-4
31-12-1237-15-7 31-3-29 31-3-30 31-3-34 31-3-35 31-8-1
31-10-3231-10.1-1 31-10.1-4 31-10.1-5 31-10.1-6 31-13-6 31-15-8
31-23-4531-14-1 31-17-3 31-23-4 31-23-10 31-23-17 31-23-19
31-23-2031-23-26 31-23-27 31-23-40 31-23-42.1 31-3-18 31-10-27
31-18-331-10.1-7 31-38-3 31-14-12 31-17-5 31-25-9 31-25-11
31-25-1231-25-12.1 31-25-10 31-22-1 31-24-34 31-27-9 31-3-9
31-15-1031-18-8 31-25-17 31-10.1-4 31-23-43 31-23-29 31-24-45
31-17-831-24-10 31-23-47 31-12-9 31-15-16 24-10-18 31-19-5
31-3-1231-24-9 31-22-22 31-28-7 31-28-7.1 31-3-32 31-18-4
24-10-1831-18-5 31-18-15 31-18-18 31-21-14 31-22-3 31-23-16
31-24-631-24-8 31-24-31 31-27-16 31-22-23 31-10-30 31-10-10
31-19-331-3-40 31-22-24 31-23-51 31-7-1 31-15-2 31-15-12.1
31-16-831-20-17 31-24-16 31-24-17 31-24-20 31-24-22 31-24-23
31-24-2431-24-25 31-24-26 31-24-27 31-24-28 31-24-29 31-24-30
31-24-3231-24-33 31-24-36 31-24-38 31-24-39 31-24-40 31-24-41
31-24-4231-24-43 31-24-46 31-24-49 31-24-51 31-24-53 31-26-3.1
31-27-1731-27-19 31-33-2 31-45-1 4-1-26 31-10.1-2 31-20-10
31-22-1331-24-13 31-27-10 31-41.1-4 31.41.2-3 Chapter 31-51
(Speeding (A)).
(b) Except as provided in §§ 8-18-9, 8-18-10, and 31-41.1-11 jurisdiction over violations
enumerated in subsection (a) shall be exercised as follows:
(1) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a state
agency;
(2) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
LC001744/SUB A - Page 4 of 7

town which has not established a municipal court; and
(3) By the municipal court over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
town which has established a municipal court.
8-18-3. Jurisdiction for certain violations. [Effective January 15, 2027.]
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, jurisdiction over the adjudication of matters
relating to violations enumerated in the following sections of the general laws is hereby conferred
upon the municipal courts and the traffic tribunal:
31-13-431-13-9 31-13-11 31-14-3 31-14-9 31-15-1 31-15-3
31-15-431-15-5 31-15-6 31-15-7 31-15-9 31-15-11 31-15-12
31-15-1331-16-1 31-16-2 31-16-4 31-16-5 31-16-7 31-16-9
31-17-131-17-2 31-17-4 31-17-6 31-17-7 31-18-12 31-20-1
31-20-231-20-9 31-21-4 31-22-2 31-22-4 31-22-5 31-22-6
31-22-731-22-8 31-22-9 31-23-1 31-23-8 31-23-13 31-23-14
31-23-1531-24-1 31-24-4 31-24-5 31-24-7 31-24-12 31-38-4
31-12-1237-15-7 31-3-29 31-3-30 31-3-34 31-3-35 31-8-1
31-10-3231-10.1-1 31-10.1-4 31-10.1-5 31-10.1-6 31-13-6 31-15-8
31-23-4531-14-1 31-17-3 31-23-4 31-23-10 31-23-17 31-23-19
31-23-2031-23-26 31-23-27 31-23-40 31-23-42.1 31-3-18 31-10-27
31-18-331-10.1-7 31-38-3 31-14-12 31-17-5 31-25-9 31-25-11
31-25-1231-25-12.1 31-25-10 31-22-1 31-24-34 31-27-9 31-3-9
31-15-1031-18-8 31-25-17 31-10.1-4 31-23-43 31-23-29 31-24-45
31-17-831-24-10 31-23-47 31-12-9 31-15-16 24-10-18 31-19-5
31-3-1231-24-9 31-22-22 31-28-7 31-28-7.1 31-3-32 31-18-4
24-10-1831-18-5 31-18-15 31-18-18 31-21-14 31-22-3 31-23-16
31-24-631-24-8 31-24-31 31-27-16 31-22-23 31-10-30 31-10-10
31-19-331-3-40 31-22-24 31-23-51 31-7-1 31-15-2 31-15-12.1
31-16-831-20-17 31-24-16 31-24-17 31-24-20 31-24-22 31-24-23
31-24-2431-24-25 31-24-26 31-24-27 31-24-28 31-24-29 31-24-30
31-24-3231-24-33 31-24-36 31-24-38 31-24-39 31-24-40 31-24-41
31-24-4231-24-43 31-24-46 31-24-49 31-24-51 31-24-53 31-26-3.1
31-27-1731-27-19 31-33-2 31-45-1 4-1-26 31-10.1-2 31-20-10
31-22-1331-24-13 31-27-10 31-41.1-4 Chapter 31-51
(Speeding (A)).
(b) Except as provided in §§ 8-18-9, 8-18-10, and 31-41.1-11 jurisdiction over violations
LC001744/SUB A - Page 5 of 7

enumerated in subsection (a) shall be exercised as follows:
(1) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a state
agency;
(2) By the traffic tribunal over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
town which has not established a municipal court; and
(3) By the municipal court over all violations for which the summons is issued by a city or
town which has established a municipal court.
Compiler’s Notes.
Section 31-10.1-2, referred to in the table in subsection (a) of this section, is repealed by
P.L. 2024, ch. 41, § 3 and P.L. 2024, ch. 42, § 3, effective August 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001744/SUB A
========
LC001744/SUB A - Page 6 of 7